Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 4. Complaints; Hearing Procedures.

Sec. 39.52.310.
Complaints.

The attorney general may initiate a complaint, or elect to treat as a complaint, any matter disclosed under AS

39.52.210

,

39.52.220

,

39.52.250

, or

39.52.260

. The attorney general may not, during a campaign period, initiate a complaint concerning the conduct of the governor or lieutenant governor who is a candidate for election to state office.

A person may file a complaint with the attorney general regarding the conduct of a current or former public officer. A complaint must be in writing, be signed under oath, and contain a clear statement of the details of the alleged violation.

If a complaint alleges a violation of AS

39.52.110

—

39.52.190

by the governor, lieutenant governor, or the attorney general, the matter shall be referred to the personnel board. The personnel board shall return a complaint concerning the conduct of the governor or lieutenant governor who is a candidate for election to state office as provided in (j) of this section if the complaint is initiated during a campaign period. The personnel board shall retain independent counsel who shall act in the place of the attorney general under (d) — (i) of this section, AS

39.52.320

—

39.52.350

, and

39.52.360(c)

and (d). Notwithstanding AS

36.30.015(d)

, the personnel board may contract for or hire independent counsel under this subsection without notifying or securing the approval of the Department of Law.

The attorney general shall review each complaint filed, to determine whether it is properly completed and contains allegations which, if true, would constitute conduct in violation of this chapter. The attorney general may require the complainant to provide additional information before accepting the complaint. If the attorney general determines that the allegations in the complaint do not warrant an investigation, the attorney general shall dismiss the complaint with notice to the complainant and the subject of the complaint.

The attorney general may refer a complaint to the subject’s designated supervisor for resolution under AS

39.52.210

or

39.52.220

.

If the attorney general accepts a complaint for investigation, the attorney general shall serve a copy of the complaint upon the subject of the complaint, for a response. The attorney general may require the subject to provide, within 20 days after service, full and fair disclosure in writing of all facts and circumstances pertaining to the alleged violation. Misrepresentation of a material fact in a response to the attorney general is a violation of this chapter. Failure to answer within the prescribed time, or within any additional time period that may be granted in writing by the attorney general, may be considered an admission of the allegations in the complaint.

If a complaint is accepted under (f) of this section, the attorney general shall investigate to determine whether a violation of this chapter has occurred. At any stage of an investigation or review, the attorney general may issue a subpoena under AS

39.52.380

.

A violation of this chapter may be investigated within two years after discovery of the alleged violation.

The unwillingness of a complainant to assist in an investigation, the withdrawal of a complaint, or restitution by the subject of the complaint may, but need not in and of itself, justify termination of an investigation or proceeding.

The personnel board shall return a complaint concerning the conduct of the governor or lieutenant governor who is a candidate for state office received during a campaign period to the complainant unless the governor or lieutenant governor, as appropriate, permits the personnel board to assume jurisdiction under this subsection. If the personnel board receives a complaint concerning the conduct of the governor or lieutenant governor who is a candidate during the campaign period, the personnel board shall immediately notify the subject of the complaint of the receipt of the complaint, of the suspension of the personnel board’s jurisdiction during the campaign period, and of the candidate’s right to waive the suspension of jurisdiction under this subsection. The candidate may, within 11 days after the personnel board mails or otherwise sends notice of the complaint to the candidate, notify the personnel board that the candidate chooses to have the personnel board proceed with the complaint under this section. If the candidate does not act within that time or if the candidate notifies the personnel board that the candidate is not waiving the suspension of jurisdiction, the personnel board shall return the complaint to the complainant with notice of the suspension of jurisdiction under this subsection and of the right of the complainant to file the complaint after the end of the campaign period.

A campaign period under this section begins on the later of 45 days before a primary election in which the governor or lieutenant governor is a candidate for state office or the day on which the individual files as a candidate for state office and ends at the close of election day for the general or special election in which the individual is a candidate or on the day that the candidate withdraws from the election, if earlier. For a candidate who loses in the primary election, the campaign period ends on the day that results of the primary election showing that another individual won the election are certified.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986; am §§ 93 — 95 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For executive branch code of ethics, see 9 AAC 52.

Sec. 39.52.320.
Dismissal before formal proceedings.

If, after investigation, it appears that there is no probable cause to believe that a violation of this chapter has occurred, the attorney general shall dismiss the complaint. The attorney general shall communicate disposition of the matter promptly to the complainant under AS

39.52.335(c)

and to the subject of the complaint.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986; am § 96 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Sec. 39.52.330.
Corrective or preventive action.

After determining that the conduct of the subject of a complaint does not warrant a hearing under AS

39.52.360

, the attorney general shall recommend action to correct or prevent a violation of this chapter.
The attorney general shall communicate the recommended action to the complainant and the subject of the complaint. The subject of the complaint shall comply with the attorney general’s recommendation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For executive branch code of ethics, see 9 AAC 52.

Sec. 39.52.335.
Summary of disposition of complaints and review by personnel board.

When the attorney general initiates or receives a complaint under AS

39.52.310

, the attorney general shall immediately forward a copy of the complaint to the personnel board.

Each month, the attorney general shall file a report with the personnel board concerning the status of each pending complaint and the resolution of complaints that have been closed since the previous report.

If a complaint is dismissed under AS

39.52.320

or resolved under AS

39.52.330

, the attorney general shall promptly prepare a summary of the matter and provide a copy of the summary to the personnel board and the complainant. The summary is confidential unless the

dismissal or resolution agreed to under AS

39.52.320

or

39.52.330

is public; or

superior court makes the matter public under (h) of this section.

Within 15 days after receipt of a summary under this section, a complainant may file comments with the personnel board regarding the disposition of the complaint.

At its next regular meeting that begins more than 15 days after receipt of a summary under this section, the personnel board shall review the summary and comments, if any, filed by the complainant. The personnel board may compel the attendance of the subject of the complaint or the complainant at the meeting and may compel the production of documents. Attendance may be by teleconference. The attorney general or the attorney general’s designee shall be available to respond to questions from the personnel board concerning the disposition of the complaint.

After review of the summary, the personnel board may issue a report on the disposition of the complaint. If the matter is confidential and the board determines that publication of the name of the subject is in the public interest, the report may include a recommendation that the matter be made public.

If the summary is confidential under (c) of this section,

comments filed by the complainant, if any, are confidential;

the personnel board shall conduct the review of the summary in executive session; and

the personnel board report, if any, is confidential; the personnel board shall make available to the public an expurgated copy of a confidential report with sufficient deletions and editing to prevent disclosure of the identity of the persons involved in the matter.

If the disposition of a complaint is not made public and the personnel board report under (f) of this section includes a recommendation that the matter be made public, an interested party may file an action against the state in superior court requesting that the court make public the complaint, the attorney general’s disposition of the complaint, and the personnel board report. The court may order the matter or portions of the matter made public if the court determines that

the dismissal or resolution of the complaint was clearly contrary to the requirements of this chapter;

one or more of the allegations in the information to be released is supported by substantial evidence;

the matter concerns the public interest; and

release of the information will not infringe on any protected rights or liberties of the subject.

History.

(§ 97 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Sec. 39.52.340.
Confidentiality.

Except as provided in AS

39.52.335

, before the initiation of formal proceedings under AS

39.52.350

, the complaint and all other documents and information regarding an investigation conducted under this chapter or obtained by the attorney general during the investigation are confidential and not subject to inspection by the public. In the case of a complaint concerning the governor, lieutenant governor, or attorney general, all meetings of the personnel board concerning the complaint and investigation before the determination of probable cause are closed to the public. If, in the course of an investigation or probable cause determination, the attorney general finds evidence of probable criminal activity, the attorney general shall transmit a statement and factual findings limited to that activity to the appropriate law enforcement agency. If the attorney general finds evidence of a probable violation of AS 15.13, the attorney general shall transmit a statement to that effect and factual findings limited to the probable violation to the Alaska Public Offices Commission. The attorney general and all persons contacted during the course of an investigation shall maintain confidentiality regarding the existence of the investigation.

It is not a violation of this section for a person to contact an attorney or to participate in a criminal investigation.

The subject of the complaint may, in writing, waive the confidentiality protection of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986; am § 98 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For executive branch code of ethics, see 9 AAC 52.

Sec. 39.52.350.
Probable cause for hearing.

If the attorney general determines that there is probable cause to believe that a knowing violation of this chapter or a violation that cannot be corrected under AS

39.52.330

has occurred, or that the subject of a complaint failed to comply with a recommendation for corrective or preventive action, the attorney general shall initiate formal proceedings by serving a copy of an accusation upon the subject of the accusation. The accusation shall specifically set out the alleged violation. After service, the accusation is a public document open to inspection. Except as provided in AS

39.52.370(c)

, all subsequent proceedings are open to the public.

The subject of the accusation shall file an answer with the attorney general within 20 days after service of the accusation, or at a later time specified by the attorney general. If the subject of the accusation fails to timely answer, the allegations are considered admitted.

If the subject of the accusation denies that a violation of this chapter has occurred, the attorney general shall refer the matter to the personnel board, which shall notify the chief administrative law judge (AS

44.64.010

), who shall appoint an administrative law judge to serve as a hearing officer to conduct a hearing.

If the subject of the accusation admits a violation of this chapter, the attorney general shall refer the matter to the personnel board to impose penalties under AS

39.52.410

,

39.52.440

, and

39.52.450

, as appropriate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986; am § 60 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 39.52.360.
Hearings.

The hearing officer may convene a prehearing conference to set a time and place for the hearing, and for stipulation as to matters of fact and to simplify issues, identify and schedule prehearing matters, and resolve other similar matters before the hearing.

The hearing officer may administer oaths, hold hearings, and take testimony. Upon application by a party to the hearing, the hearing officer may issue subpoenas under AS

39.52.380

.

The attorney general shall present the charges before the hearing officer. At a hearing, the attorney general has the burden of demonstrating by a preponderance of the evidence that the subject of the accusation has, by act or omission, violated this chapter.

The parties to a hearing are the attorney general and the subject of the accusation. The subject of an accusation may be represented by counsel. Each party has an opportunity to be heard and cross-examine witnesses, who shall testify under oath.

The Administrative Procedure Act does not apply to hearings under this section, except as provided in AS

39.52.380

.

Technical rules of evidence do not apply, but the hearing officer’s findings must be based upon reliable and relevant evidence. All testimony and other evidence taken at the hearing must be recorded and the evidence maintained. Copies of transcripts of the hearing record are available to the subject of the accusation at the subject’s expense; however, upon request, a copy of the recording of the hearing must be furnished without charge to the subject of the accusation.

At the conclusion of the formal hearing, the hearing officer may direct either or both parties to submit proposed findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommendation to be filed within 10 days after the conclusion of the hearing.

Within 30 days after the conclusion of a formal hearing, the hearing officer shall serve a written report on the personnel board and the parties, unless the personnel board grants an extension of time. The report must contain the officer’s findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommendation. The hearing officer shall submit the record to the personnel board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For Administrative Procedure Act, see AS 44.62.

Sec. 39.52.370.
Personnel board action.

Within 10 days after receipt of the hearing officer’s report, either party may protest the officer’s findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommendation, and, if a protest is filed, shall serve a copy on the other party. Oral argument before the personnel board must be provided only if requested by either party. The board chair shall set the deadline for submission of requests for oral argument, and set the dates for submission of briefs and oral argument before the board, if requested.

The board may issue subpoenas under AS

39.52.380

, and may, for good cause shown, augment the hearing record, in whole or in part, or hold a hearing de novo.

The personnel board shall review each report submitted by a hearing officer and shall either adopt or amend the findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommendation of the officer. Deliberations of the personnel board must be conducted in sessions not open to the public.

If the personnel board determines that a violation occurred, it may impose the penalties in AS

39.52.410

,

39.52.440

, and

39.52.450

, as appropriate. If the board determines that no violation occurred, the board shall issue a written order of dismissal.

The personnel board secretary shall promptly notify the parties and the public officer’s designated supervisor of the board’s action.

The subject of the accusation may appeal the personnel board’s decision by filing an appeal in the superior court as provided in the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986)

Sec. 39.52.380.
Subpoenas.

As provided in AS

39.52.310(g)

,

39.52.360(b)

, and

39.52.370(b)

, the attorney general, independent counsel retained under AS

39.52.310(c)

, a hearing officer, the subject of an accusation, and the personnel board may summon witnesses and require the production of records, books, and papers by the issuance of subpoenas.

Subpoenas must be served in the manner prescribed by AS

44.62.430

and Rule 45 of the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. Failure or refusal to obey a subpoena issued under this chapter is punishable as contempt in the manner provided by law and court rule. The superior court may compel obedience to the subpoena in the same manner as prescribed for obedience to a subpoena issued by the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986)

Sec. 39.52.390.
Service.

Service of an accusation must be accomplished in accordance with Rule 4 of the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.
Service of any other pleading, motion, or other document must be accomplished in accordance with Rule 5 of the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986)